Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201748-628.14
Extended benefits; terms, defined; weekly extended benefit amount; payment of emergency unemployment compensation.

(1) As used in the Employment Security Law, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) Extended benefit period means a period which begins with the third week after a week for which there is a state "on" indicator and ends with either of the following weeks, whichever occurs later: (i) The third week after the first week for which there is a state "off" indicator or (ii) the thirteenth consecutive week of such period, except that no extended benefit period may begin by reason of a state "on" indicator before the fourteenth week following the end of a prior extended benefit period which was in effect with respect to this state;

(b) Extended benefits means benefits, including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen or ex-servicewomen pursuant to 5 U.S.C. chapter 85, payable to an individual for weeks of unemployment in his or her eligibility period;

(c) Eligibility period of an individual means the period consisting of the weeks in his or her benefit year which begin in an extended benefit period and, if his or her benefit year ends within such extended benefit period, any weeks thereafter which begin in such period. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Employment Security Law, if the benefit year of any individual ends within an extended benefit period, the remaining balance of extended benefits that such individual would, but for this section, be entitled to receive in that extended benefit period, with respect to weeks of unemployment beginning after the end of the benefit year, shall be reduced, but not below zero, by the product of the number of weeks for which the individual received any amounts as trade readjustment allowances within that benefit year multiplied by the individual's weekly benefit amount for extended benefits;

(d) Exhaustee means an individual who, with respect to any week of unemployment in his or her eligibility period:

(i)(A) Has received, prior to such week, all of the regular benefits that were available to him or her under the Employment Security Law of this state or under the unemployment insurance law of any other state, including dependents' allowances and benefits payable to federal civilian employees and ex-servicemen or ex-servicewomen under 5 U.S.C. chapter 85, in his or her current benefit year that includes such week, except for the purposes of this subdivision, an individual shall be deemed to have received all of the regular benefits that were available to him or her although as a result of a pending appeal with respect to wages or employment or both wages and employment that were not considered in the original monetary determination in his or her benefit year, he or she may subsequently be determined to be entitled to added regular benefits; or (B) his or her benefit year having expired prior to such week, has no, or insufficient, wages or employment or both wages and employment on the basis of which he or she could establish a new benefit year that would include such week;

(ii) Has no right to unemployment benefits or allowances, as the case may be, under the Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act, the Trade Expansion Act of 1962, the Automotive Products Trade Act of 1965, and such other federal laws as are specified in regulations issued by the United States Secretary of Labor; and

(iii) Has not received and is not seeking unemployment benefits under the unemployment compensation law of Canada, but if he or she is seeking such benefits and the appropriate agency finally determines that he or she is not entitled to benefits under such law, he or she is considered an exhaustee;

(e) Rate of insured unemployment means the percentage, used by the commissioner in determining whether there is a state "on" or state "off" indicator, derived by dividing (i) the average weekly number of individuals filing claims for regular compensation under the Employment Security Law for weeks of unemployment with respect to the most recent thirteen-consecutive-week period, as determined by the commissioner on the basis of his or her reports to the United States Secretary of Labor, by (ii) the average monthly employment covered under the Employment Security Law for the first four of the most recent six completed calendar quarters ending before the end of such thirteen-week period;

(f) Regular benefits means benefits payable to an individual under the Employment Security Law of this state or under the unemployment insurance law of any other state, including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen or ex-servicewomen pursuant to 5 U.S.C. chapter 85, other than extended benefits;

(g) State "off" indicator means a week for which the commissioner determines that, for the period consisting of such week and the immediately preceding twelve weeks, neither subdivision (1)(h)(i) or (1)(h)(ii) of this section was satisfied; and

(h) State "on" indicator means a week for which the commissioner determines that, for the period consisting of such week and the immediately preceding twelve weeks, the rate of insured unemployment, not seasonally adjusted, under the Employment Security Law: (i) Equaled or exceeded one hundred twenty percent of the average of such rates for the corresponding thirteen-week period ending in each of the preceding two calendar years and equaled or exceeded five percent or (ii) equaled or exceeded six percent.

(2) Except when the result would be inconsistent with the other provisions of this section, as provided in the rules and regulations of the commissioner, the provisions of the Employment Security Law which apply to claims for or payment of regular benefits shall apply to claims for and payment of extended benefits. An individual shall be eligible to receive extended benefits with respect to any week of unemployment in his or her eligibility period only if the commissioner finds that with respect to such week:

(a) Such individual is an exhaustee;

(b) Such individual has satisfied the requirements of the Employment Security Law for the receipt of regular benefits that are applicable to individuals claiming extended benefits, including not being subject to a disqualification for the receipt of benefits;

(c) Sections 48-628.15 and 48-628.16 do not apply; and

(d) Such individual has been paid wages for insured work during the individual's base period equal to at least one and one-half times the wages paid in that calendar quarter of the individual's base period in which such wages were highest.

(3) The weekly extended benefit amount payable to an individual for a week of total unemployment in his or her eligibility period shall be an amount equal to the weekly benefit amount payable to him or her during his or her applicable benefit year. The total extended benefit amount payable to any eligible individual with respect to his or her applicable benefit year shall be the least of the following amounts:

(a) Fifty percent of the total amount of regular benefits which were payable to him or her under the Employment Security Law in his or her applicable benefit year; or

(b) Thirteen times his or her weekly benefit amount which was payable to him or her under the Employment Security Law for a week of total unemployment in the applicable benefit year.

(4) Whenever an extended benefit period is to become effective in this state as a result of a state "on" indicator or an extended benefit period is to be terminated in this state as a result of a state "off" indicator, the commissioner shall make an appropriate public announcement. Computations required to determine the rate of insured unemployment shall be made by the commissioner in accordance with regulations prescribed by the United States Secretary of Labor. Any amount of extended benefits payable to any individual for any week, if not an even dollar amount, shall be rounded to the next lower full dollar amount.

(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Employment Security Law, during an extended benefit period, the Governor may provide for the payment of emergency unemployment compensation pursuant to Public Law 110-252, as amended, or any substantially similar federal unemployment compensation paid entirely from federal funds to individuals prior to the payment of extended benefits pursuant to this section and sections 48-628.15 and 48-628.16.

Laws 1971, LB 651, § 7;

Laws 1972, LB 1392, § 5;

Laws 1977, LB 509, § 6;

Laws 1979, LB 581, § 4;

Laws 1981, LB 470, § 4;

Laws 1982, LB 801, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 746, § 3;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 23;

Laws 2010, LB1055, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-628.02;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 44.